Washington statutes.
RCW 36.160.050

Cultural access program—Nonsupplantation.

In creating a program under this chapter, any county creating the program must affirm that any funding such county usually and customarily provides to cultural organizations similar to funding that would be available to those organizations under this chapter may not be replaced or materially diminished as a result of funding becoming available under this chapter. If an organization designated to receive funds under this chapter is a state-related cultural organization, the funds received under this chapter may not replace or materially diminish any funding usually or customarily provided by the state.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 24 s 303.]

NOTES:

Construction—2015 3rd sp.s. c 24: See note following RCW 36.160.030.